apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="šis__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šis</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šī</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šīs</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šās</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>šī</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>šā</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šam</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šai</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šo</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šo</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šinī</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šajā</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>šai</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šie</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šīs</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šo</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šo</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šiem</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šīm</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šos</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šīs</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>šais</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šajās</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>šinīs</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šajos</l>
          <r>šis<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vis/s__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>s<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e><par n="šis__det"/></e>
    <e><i>vis</i><par n="vis/s__det"/></e>
